Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Registration and Ownership of Livestock Brands.

§ 69-29-101.
Purpose of article.

The purpose of this article is to provide a place for registration of brands or marks of cattle and other livestock in an appropriate bureau, which may be called the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau, in the Department of Agriculture and Commerce under the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of the State of Mississippi, in order to avoid confusion as to brands or marks of cattle and other livestock, and to protect the owners against theft, and to aid the agricultural and livestock theft investigators in the Department of Agriculture and Commerce in tracing such cattle and other livestock when stolen, apprehending such thieves and returning the cattle and other livestock to the owner thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-02; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-103.
Definitions.

The following words, or similar words, when used in this article shall have the following meaning unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of the State of Mississippi, under whose supervision this article is placed.

“Bureau” means the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau, or its successor, in the Department of Agriculture and Commerce, under the administration of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce for the apprehending of cattle and other livestock thieves.

“Brand” means any recorded identification mark applied to any position on the hide of a live animal by means of heat, acid or chemical.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association or corporation.

“Livestock” means horses, cattle, swine, sheep, poultry and other domestic or exotic animals, birds or fish produced for profit.

“Livestock market” means any place at which a person assembles livestock either for public or private sale by him, such services to be compensated for by the owner on a commission basis or otherwise, or where such person purchases livestock for resale, except:

Any place other than at a permanently established livestock market used solely for the dispersal sale of the livestock of a farmer, dairyman, livestock breeder or feeder who is discontinuing said business and no other livestock is there sold or offered for sale;

Any farm, ranch, or place where livestock either raised or kept thereon for the grazing season or for fattening is sold, and no other livestock is brought there for sale or offered for sale;

The premises of any person engaged in the raising of livestock for breeding purposes only, who limits his or its sale to animals of his or its own production;

Any place where a breeder or an association of breeders of livestock of any class assemble and offer for sale and sell under his or their own management any livestock, when such breeder or association of breeders shall assume all responsibility of such sale and the title of livestock sold.

“Mark” means a distinct marking or device placed on a live animal sufficient to distinguish the animal readily if it becomes intermixed with other animals, and includes a tattoo.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-01; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 1, eff July 1, 1952; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-105.
Registration and ownership of brands; transfer of registration and ownership; penalties for violation.

Any cattle or other livestock owner, who uses or desires to use and adopt a brand or mark to identify his livestock must register his brand or mark by making application for such registration to the Department of Agriculture and Commerce. Not only all livestock owners who have their cattle branded before this law goes into effect must apply for registration, but also those persons who desire to brand or mark their livestock for the first time must apply for registration, and submit their proposed brand or mark to the department for clearing before it is applied. The application shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the department, which application shall be accompanied by a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) and a facsimile of the brand or mark or proposed brand or mark to be registered shall also be furnished by the applicant. All fees collected hereunder for registration, transfer, or reregistration of brands or marks shall be deposited in the State Treasury. If the brand or mark described in the application has not previously been registered by another cattle owner, or does not closely resemble a registered brand or mark, the department shall approve the application, register the brand or mark in the name of the applicant, and issue to the applicant a certificate of registration. In case of duplication of brands or marks as shown by applications, the owner of the brand or mark who first records with the department will be recognized. When a livestock owner, who has registered a brand or mark with the department, transfers such brand or mark to another person, he shall immediately notify the department of the transfer, giving the date of transfer, and the name and address of the transferee. Upon receipt of the notice and a transfer fee of Two Dollars ($2.00), the department shall cause such transfer to be noted in the register of brands and marks, and such brand or mark shall not be used by the new owner until permission has been given by the department for the use of such brand or mark.

No two (2) or more brands or marks of the same design or figure, and no two (2) or more earmarks of the same kind shall be adopted, designed and recorded, and when a brand, mark or earmark shall have been designed, adopted and recorded, the person so adopting and recording same shall be entitled to the exclusive use thereof, and it shall be his exclusive property, but the right to the use of such brand or mark may be sold and transferred by an instrument in writing, signed, acknowledged and recorded in the chancery clerk’s office of the county where the brand, mark or earmark is recorded. When the right to the use of a brand, mark or earmark has been sold and transferred and recorded as herein provided, the chancery clerk shall note on the “brand, mark and earmark book” that such brand, mark or earmark has been sold and transferred, giving the book and page where such transfer is recorded.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and by imprisonment in the county jail not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months. Any person convicted of stealing livestock is subject to the penalties provided in Section 97-17-53.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2025, 4896-03; Laws, 1936, ch. 294; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-107.
Copy of certificate of registration as evidence.

In all suits at law or in equity, or in any criminal proceedings when the title or right of possession is involved, a copy of the certificate of brand or mark registration verified by affidavit of the department shall be received in evidence by the court as evidence of the registration of such brand or mark in accordance with the requirements of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-04; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 4, eff July 1, 1952; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-109.
Reregistration and renewal of brands.

All brands or marks of cattle and other livestock, upon being registered with the department shall be reregistered once every five (5) years thereafter. Those brands or marks which have been filed and recorded in the Office of the Secretary of State after January 1, 1946, give the owner priority to the use of such brand or mark, and in event of duplication, the brand or mark first filed with the Secretary of State shall have priority over any same or similar brand or mark filed with the Secretary of State thereafter.

After the effective date of this article it shall be necessary for all such owners of brands or marks who have filed and recorded brands or marks in the Office of the Secretary of State after January 1, 1946, to reregister any and all such brands or marks with the department, and pay the necessary registration fee. Brands or marks recorded in the Office of the Secretary of State before January 1, 1946, are not recognized for the purpose of priority, because of the confused state of the records. After the registration of such brands or marks with the department, they must be reregistered not later than five (5) years thereafter, or ownership thereto will be lost.

All brands or marks registered after the effective date of this article shall be reregistered on or before five (5) years after the date of registration. Upon the transfer of any such brand or mark, notice of such transfer shall be furnished the department by the transferor, and the department shall keep a record of all such transfers.

At least ninety (90) days before the renewal date for all brands or marks, the department shall notify all persons having brands or marks registered of the date on which such brand or mark must be renewed. On or before the renewal date of all brands or marks the registered owner thereof shall pay to the department a renewal fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) and shall furnish such additional information as the department may require on forms to be furnished by the department. If any cattle owner fails to renew any brand or mark registered in his name, such brand or mark shall be forfeited and shall be available to any other applicant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-05; Laws, 1952, ch. 173 § 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 342, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-111.
Forms; register of brands.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall prescribe and furnish forms on which applications for registration, reregistration and transfer of brands or marks shall be made and shall furnish such forms to the sheriff and the county agricultural agent of each county of the state to be distributed on request to livestock owners desiring to make application for registration of brands or marks and such applications may also be furnished to applicants by the department. The department shall maintain a complete register of all brands or marks, showing the name and address of the owner, and shall annually publish and distribute copies of this register and supplementary copies thereof to every livestock market and sheriff’s office and chancery clerk in the state. Copies of the register of brands and marks may be furnished to other persons requesting such copies, at a price to be determined by the department. Copies of the register of brands and marks shall be published in booklet form. The department shall also determine from its records of registration the ownership of any estrayed cattle and furnish such information to interested persons, upon receipt of notice giving details of the kind of animal, color, weight, size, sex, age, marks, brands and other identifying information.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-06; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-113.
Livestock market operators and hide dealers to keep records.

Every operator of a livestock market where livestock is sold shall keep a copy of the register of brands and marks in his place of business where it will be easily accessible for public inspection.

The operator of every livestock market where livestock is sold, together with all dealers, slaughterers and butchers who buy livestock for slaughter which was not purchased at a livestock market, shall keep a record covering all livestock received, including:

The name and address of the owner of the livestock;

The license tag number of the vehicle delivering the livestock;

The name and address of the driver of the vehicle delivering the livestock and his motor vehicle operator’s license number or Social Security number, preferably both;

The number of livestock received; and

A description of livestock including color.

These records shall be kept for public inspection for a period of two (2) years after the livestock is received.

Livestock hide dealers are required to keep a record of all hides of livestock received by them, including:

The name and address of the owner of the hides;

The vehicle tag number of the vehicle delivering the hides;

The name and address of the driver of the vehicle and his motor vehicle operator’s license number or Social Security number, preferably both; and

A description of the hides, including any brands or marks.

Livestock hide dealers shall keep such records for a period of two (2) years from the time of purchase.

Any livestock market operator, dealer, slaughterer, butcher or livestock hide dealer who fails to keep these records and make them available to authorized inspectors or officers of the law shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-07; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 7; Laws, 1971, ch. 491, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-115.
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall have authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this article and that shall facilitate the tracing and identification of livestock and afford protection against stealing and unlawful dealing in livestock.

Any driver moving livestock from any advertised sale shall have a bill of sale or other written evidence of purchase for the livestock in his possession, to be shown on request of any duly authorized law enforcement officer and to be delivered to the purchaser with delivery of the livestock.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 8; Laws, 1971, ch. 491, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-117.
Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for:

Any person to use any brand or mark for branding cattle or other livestock unless the brand or mark is registered with the Department of Agriculture and Commerce;

Any person to obliterate, alter or deface the brand or mark of any animals;

Any livestock market to receive and sell livestock unless records of such sale are kept in accordance with the requirements of this article;

Any livestock market to fail to keep a copy of the register of brands and marks furnished to them by the department in a place easily accessible to interested parties;

Any livestock hide dealer to fail or refuse to keep records required by subsection (c) of Section 69-29-113.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-09; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 9; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 69-29-119.
Minor owner may have separate brands.

Minors owning cattle or stock separate from that of the father or guardian may have a brand and mark, which shall be recorded; the father or guardian shall be responsible for the proper use of such brand and mark of any such minor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 1561; 1930, § 5469; 1942, § 4897; Laws, 1916, ch. 117.

§ 69-29-121.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00), nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for a term of not more than six months, or both, in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4896-10; Laws, 1952, ch. 173, § 10, eff July 1, 1952.